Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.210

Procedure for merger.

Any two or more domestic corporations may merge into one of such corporations pursuant to a plan of merger approved in the manner provided in this chapter.

Each corporation shall adopt a plan of merger setting forth:

(1) The names of the corporations proposing to merge, and the name of the corporation into which they propose to merge, which is hereinafter designated as the surviving corporation.

(2) The terms and conditions of the proposed merger.

(3) A statement of any changes in the articles of incorporation of the surviving corporation to be effected by such merger.

(4) Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger as are deemed necessary or desirable.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 42.]